Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,167
Scope of inspection rights.

(a) A member's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member the agent or attorney represents.

(b) The right to copy records under section 21-19,166 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or other means.

(c) The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

(d) The corporation may comply with a member's demand to inspect the record of members under subdivision (b)(3) of section 21-19,166 by providing the member with a list of its members that was compiled no earlier than the date of the member's demand.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 167.